en: Chair & Sofa Supports
xx: Chair & Sofa Supports
cs: Nosné plochy křesel a pohovek
da: Sædeunderlag til stole og sofaer
de: Sitzverstärkung für Stühle & Sofas
es: Soportes para sillas y sofás
fr: Supports pour fauteuils et canapés
it: Supporti per sedie e divani
ja: 椅子・ソファ用支持材
nl: Ondersteuning voor stoelen en sofa's
no: Underlag til sofaer og stoler
pl: Podpórki pod sofy i krzesła
pt: Suportes para sofás e poltronas
ru: Опоры для стульев и соф
sv: Stol- och soffstöd
tr: Koltuk ve Kanepe Destekleri

en: Sectional Sofa Units
xx: Sectional Sofa Units
cs: Části rohových sedaček
da: Sofasektioner
de: Anbausofas
es: Unidades para sofás seccionales
fr: Éléments pour canapés modulables
it: Moduli sezioni per divano
ja: 組み合わせ式ソファー ユニット
nl: Zitbankelementen
no: Modulsoafer
pl: Segmenty wersalek
pt: Unidades de sofás modulares
ru: Диванные секции
sv: Soffsektioner
tr: Ayrılabilir Koltuk Birimleri

en: Sofas
xx: Sofas
cs: Pohovky
da: Sofaer
de: Sofas
es: Sofás
fr: Canapés, Canapé
it: Divani
ja: ソファ
nl: Sofa's
no: Sofaer
pl: Sofy
pt: Sofás
ru: Диваны
sv: Soffor
tr: Kanepeler

en: Textile sofa
fr: Canapé en textile

en: Convertible sofa
fr: Canapé convertible

en: Table Accessories
xx: Table Accessories
cs: Stoly – příslušenství
da: Borde – tilbehør
de: Tischzubehör
es: Accesorios para mesas
fr: Accessoires pour tables
it: Accessori da tavolo
ja: テーブル関連用品
nl: Tafelaccessoires
no: Bordtilbehør
pl: Akcesoria stołowe
pt: Acessórios para mesas
ru: Принадлежности для столов
sv: Bordstillbehör
tr: Masa Aksesuarları

en: Table Legs
xx: Table Legs
cs: Nohy ke stolům
da: Bordben
de: Tischbeine
es: Patas para mesas
fr: Pieds de table
it: Gambe per tavoli
ja: テーブル脚
nl: Tafelpoten
no: Bordbein
pl: Nogi stołowe
pt: Pernas de mesa
ru: Ножки для столов
sv: Bordsben
tr: Masa Ayakları

en: Table Tops
xx: Table Tops
cs: Stolní desky
da: Bordplader
de: Tischplatten
es: Tableros para mesas
fr: Plateaux de table, Plateau de table
it: Pianali per tavoli
ja: テーブル天板
nl: Tafelbladen
no: Bordplater
pl: Blaty stołowe
pt: Tampos de mesa
ru: Столешницы
sv: Bordsskivor
tr: Masa Tablaları

en: Tables
xx: Tables
cs: Stoly
da: Borde
de: Tische
es: Mesas
fr: Tables, Table (à manger, d'extérieur, de jardin, de camping, de pique-nique)
it: Tavoli
ja: テーブル
nl: Tafels
no: Bord
pl: Stoły
pt: Mesas
ru: Столы
sv: Bord
tr: Masalar

en: Wooden table
fr: Table en bois

en: Accent Tables
xx: Accent Tables
cs: Malé stolky
da: Aflastningsborde
de: Ziertische
es: Mesas decorativas
fr: Consoles, Console, Console murale
it: Tavolini decorativi
ja: アクセントテーブル
nl: Accenttafels
no: Effektbord
pl: Stoliki
pt: Mesas auxiliares
ru: Приставные и узкие столы
sv: Sidobord
tr: Dekoratif Masalar

en: Coffee Tables
xx: Coffee Tables
cs: Konferenční stolky
da: Kaffeborde
de: Couchtische
es: Mesas de centro
fr: Tables basses, Table basse, Table gigogne
it: Tavolini da salotto
ja: コーヒーテーブル
nl: Salontafels
no: Salongbord
pl: Stoliki kawowe
pt: Mesas de centro
ru: Кофейные столы
sv: Soffbord
tr: Orta Sehpalar

en: End Tables
xx: End Tables
cs: Odkládací stolky
da: Sideborde
de: Beistelltische
es: Mesas auxiliares
fr: Bouts de canapé
it: Tavolini
ja: サイドテーブル
nl: Bijzettafels
no: Endebord
pl: Stoliki niskie
pt: Mesinhas de apoio
ru: Приставные столики
sv: Lampbord
tr: Köşe Sehpaları

en: Sofa Tables
xx: Sofa Tables
cs: Úzké stolky
da: Sofaborde
de: Konsolentische
es: Consolas para sofás
fr: Tables de canapé, Bout de canapé, Guéridon
it: Tavolini da divano
ja: ソファーテーブル
nl: Canapétafels
no: Sofabord
pl: Ławy
pt: Mesas-balcão
ru: Узкие столы
sv: Avlastningsbord
tr: Çekmeceli Masalar

en: Activity Tables
xx: Activity Tables
cs: Hrací stoly
da: Aktivitetsborde
de: Kinderspieltische
es: Mesas de actividades
fr: Tables d'activités
it: Tavoli per attività
ja: プレイテーブル
nl: Activiteitentafels
no: Aktivitetsbord
pl: Stoliki dla dzieci
pt: Mesas de atividades
ru: Столы для игр
sv: Aktivitetsbord
tr: Aktivite Masaları

en: Folding Tables
xx: Folding Tables
cs: Skládací stoly
da: Foldeborde
de: Klapptische
es: Mesas plegables
fr: Tables pliantes, Table de camping pique-nique pliante portable avec 4 sieges, Table encastrable
it: Tavoli pieghevoli
ja: 折りたたみテーブル
nl: Vouwtafels
no: Sammenleggbare bord
pl: Stoły składane
pt: Mesas dobradiças
ru: Раскладные столы
sv: Fällbord
tr: Katlanır Masalar

en: Kitchen & Dining Room Tables
xx: Kitchen & Dining Room Tables
cs: Kuchyňské a jídelní stoly
da: Køkken- og spisestueborde
de: Küchen- & Esszimmertische
es: Mesas de cocina y de comedor
fr: Tables de salle à manger et de cuisine, Rallonge et extension de table, Mange-débout
it: Tavoli cucina e sala da pranzo
ja: ダイニングテーブル
nl: Keuken- en eetkamertafels
no: Kjøkken- og spisebord
pl: Stoły do kuchni i jadalni
pt: Mesas de cozinha e de sala de jantar
ru: Кухонные и обеденные столы
sv: Köks- och matbord
tr: Mutfak ve Yemek Odası Masaları

en: Kotatsu
xx: Kotatsu
cs: Kotatsu
da: Kotatsu
de: Kotatsu
es: Mesa camilla
fr: Kotatsu
it: Kotatsu
ja: こたつ
nl: Kotatsu
no: Kotatsu
pl: Kotatsu
pt: Kotatsu
ru: Котацу
sv: Kotatsu
tr: Kotatsu

en: Nightstands
xx: Nightstands
cs: Noční stolky
da: Natborde
de: Nachttische
es: Mesitas de noche
fr: Chevets, Table de chevet
it: Comodini
ja: ベッドサイドテーブル
nl: Nachtkastjes
no: Nattbord
pl: Stoliki nocne
pt: Criados-mudos
ru: Прикроватные тумбочки
sv: Nattduksbord
tr: Komodinler

en: Poker & Game Tables
xx: Poker & Game Tables
cs: Pokerové a hrací stoly
da: Poker- og spilleborde
de: Poker- & Spieltische
es: Mesas de juego y de póquer
fr: Tables de poker et de jeux
it: Tavoli da poker e da gioco
ja: カジノテーブル
nl: Poker- en spellentafels
no: Poker- og spillebord
pl: Stoły do pokera i gier
pt: Mesas de pôquer e jogos em geral
ru: Столы для покера и игр
sv: Poker- och spelbord
tr: Poker ve Oyun Masaları